Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Chapter 13. Apprenticeship

§ 1101.
Apprenticeship Division and Council.

The Apprenticeship Division and the State Apprenticeship Council (Council) shall be located within the Department of Labor. The Commissioner of Labor shall supervise the work of the Division, and shall be the Chair of the Council. The Council shall consist of 12 members, four ex officio members and eight members who shall be appointed by the Governor. Of the ex officio members, one shall be the Commissioner of Labor or designee, one shall be the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee, one shall be the Secretary of Education or designee, and one shall be the Director of the Apprenticeship Division who shall act as secretary of the Council without vote. The Council shall be composed of persons familiar with apprenticeable occupations. Of the appointed members, three shall be individuals who represent employers, three shall be individuals who represent employee organizations, and two shall be members of the public. Appointment of the employer and the employee members shall be made for the term of three years except the employer and employee members first appointed shall be appointed for the term of one, two, and three years respectively. The Governor shall annually designate one member of the Council as chair. Each member of the Council who is not a salaried official or employee of the State shall be entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), eff. May 3, 1988;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1995, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 164b;

1997, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 8

, § 7, eff. April 25, 2005;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2005, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 29, 2006;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § E.401.2, eff. June 3, 2010;

2011, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § E.401.1;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 264, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1102.
Meetings, regulations.

The Council shall meet semiannually and as often as may be necessary in the opinion of the majority of the members. The Chair shall designate the time and place of all meetings. The Council shall establish minimum standards for apprenticeship and all on-the-job training. The Council shall also make provision for the registration and approval of apprenticeship and all on-the-job training programs and individual apprentice and all on the job training agreements. The Council may adopt rules relating to its policy as are necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter; may issue State certificates of completion of apprenticeship to apprentices who have completed their trade training under apprenticeship programs registered and approved by the Council; may issue certificates to on-the-job trainees upon completion of training, may utilize the services of any State or federal agency or department which may be of assistance in carrying out its duties and the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 85

, § 1, eff. May 10, 1963;

1997, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 1103.
Supplementary instruction.

The Department of Labor shall provide for related and supplementary instruction for apprentices employed under apprenticeship programs registered and approved by the Council, and for all on-the-job trainees. To make certain there is statewide access to training opportunities, the Department shall ensure that instruction in the electrical and plumbing trades is offered at each regional CTE center, as defined by

16 V.S.A. § 1522(4)

. If the Department enters into a single-source contract with an entity to provide apprenticeship training, the contract shall specify that access to programs must be available to all Vermont residents, at least through online courses.

The Department of Labor may charge fees to the employers of apprentices registered in Vermont and to nonregistered individuals to help offset the cost of apprenticeship related instruction provided by the Department. An employer shall not charge any apprentice for any of the fees charged to the employer under this section, nor shall an employer reduce an employee’s compensation in any manner in order to recover these fees from any apprentice. The fees shall be used, in conjunction with other approved funds, to provide classroom instruction primarily for Vermont registered apprentices. The Vermont Department of Labor may adopt rules to carry out this provision.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 186

;

1963, No. 85

, § 2, eff. May 10, 1963;

1995, No. 47

, § 10, eff. April 20, 1995;

1997, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2001, No. 50

, § 1, eff. June 12, 2001;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G15, eff. June 1, 2010;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 302, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2017, No. 74

, § 45.

§ 1104.
Assistants.

The Commissioner of Labor, with the approval of the Governor, shall have power to employ and fix the compensation of such personnel of the Apprenticeship Division as the Commissioner may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The Commissioner shall also have authority to purchase such office equipment, supplies, printing, and field supplies as are deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The members of the Council shall serve without pay, but shall receive their necessary expenses incurred in attendance at meetings, to be paid on warrants issued by the Commissioner of Finance and Management on approval of the Commissioner of Labor.

HISTORY:

Amended

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b);

1995, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 164c;

1997, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1105.
Application of standards.

The standards established by the Council under section 1102 of this title shall apply only to a person, firm, corporation, employer, or organization of employers or of employees which voluntarily elects to comply with them.